New York, session 2025-2026, S290.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The highway law is amended by adding a new section 344-r to 2 read as follows: 3 § 344-r. Portion of the state highway system to be dedicated to 4 "Trooper Edward J. Sweeney". All that portion of the state highway 5 system constituting the bridge on the Meadowbrook state parkway at the 6 exit M10, Loop Parkway overpass in the town of Hempstead, county of 7 Nassau, shall be dedicated to "Trooper Edward J. Sweeney". 8 § 2. The commissioner of transportation shall provide for the instal- 9 lation and maintenance of adequate signing of the state highway system 10 as dedicated pursuant to section one of this act. However, to avoid 11 confusion and to limit any possible disruption of commerce, the dedi- 12 cation called for pursuant to section one of this act shall be one of 13 ceremonial nature and the official name of such bridge shall not be 14 changed as a result of this act. 15 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01189-02-5